Washington statutes.
RCW 26.30.020

Minors—Contracts—Educational purposes—Enforceability.

Any written obligation signed by a minor sixteen or more years of age in consideration of an educational loan received by him or her from any person is enforceable as if he or she were an adult at the time of execution, but only if prior to the making of the educational loan an educational institution has certified in writing to the person making the educational loan that the minor is enrolled, or has been accepted for enrollment, in the educational institution.

[ 2011 c 336 s 698; 1970 ex.s. c 4 s 2.]

NOTES:

Contracts of minors, disaffirmance: RCW 26.28.030.